Washington statutes.
RCW 35.10.520

Consolidation—Transfer of fire department employees—Rights and benefits.

(1) An eligible employee may transfer into the civil service system of the consolidated city or code city by filing a written request with the civil service commission of the consolidated city. Upon receipt of such request by the civil service commission the transfer of employment shall be made. The employee so transferring will (a) be on probation for the same period as are new employees in the position filled, but if the transferring employee has already completed a probationary period as a firefighter prior to the transfer, then the employee may only be terminated during the probationary period for failure to adequately perform assigned duties, not meeting the minimum qualifications of the position, or behavior that would otherwise be subject to disciplinary action, (b) be eligible for promotion no later than after completion of the probationary period, (c) receive a salary at least equal to that of other new employees in the position filled, and (d) in all other matters, such as retirement, sick leave, and vacation, have, within the city or code city civil service system, all the rights, benefits, and privileges to which he or she would have been entitled as a member of the consolidated city fire department from the beginning of his or her employment with the former city or code city fire department: PROVIDED, That for purposes of layoffs by the consolidated city or code city, only the time of service accrued with the consolidated city or code city shall apply unless an agreement is reached between the collective bargaining representatives of the employees of the consolidating fire agencies and consolidated agencies and the consolidating and consolidated fire agencies. A record of the employee's service with the former city or code city fire department shall be transmitted to the applicable civil service commission and shall be credited to such employee as a part of the period of employment in the consolidated city fire department. All accrued benefits are transferable provided that the recipient agency provides comparable benefits. All benefits shall then accrue based on the combined seniority of each employee in the recipient agency.

(2) As many of the transferring employees shall be placed upon the payroll of the consolidated city or code city fire department as the department determines are needed to provide services. These needed employees shall be taken in order of greatest seniority from any of the seniority lists of the consolidating city or code city and the remaining employees who transfer as provided in this section and RCW 35.10.510 and 35.10.530 shall head the list for employment in the civil service system in order of their seniority, to the end that they shall be the first to be reemployed in the fire department when appropriate positions become available: PROVIDED, That employees who are not immediately hired by the city, code city, or town shall be placed on a reemployment list for a period not to exceed thirty-six months unless a longer period is authorized by an agreement reached between the collective bargaining representatives of the employees of the consolidating fire agencies and consolidated fire agency and the consolidating and consolidated fire agencies.

(3) The consolidated city or code city shall retain the right to select the fire chief and assistant fire chiefs regardless of seniority.

[ 1994 c 73 s 2; 1986 c 254 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 73: See note following RCW 35.10.365.

Effective date—Legislative study—1986 c 254 ss 1-3: See note following RCW 35.10.510.